Missouri, session 2026, HB2792.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
D
Section A. Chapter 590, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 590.1035, to read as follows:
590.1035. 1. The Missouri state highway patrol shall investigate the following:
H
(1) Any incident involving the shooting of a civilian by a law enforcement officer
in a city not within a county or in a county with more than one million inhabitants;
(2) AnTy incident involving the shooting of a law enforcement officer by a civilian
in a city not within a county or in a county with more than one million inhabitants;
(3)IAny incident in which the use of force by a law enforcement officer against a
civilian results in serious bodily injury or death in a city not within a county or in a
W
county with more than one million inhabitants; and
(4) Any incident in which the use of force by a civilian against a law enforcement
officer results in serious bodily injury or death in a city not within a county or in a
county with more than one million inhabitants.
2. The local law enforcement agency shall reimburse the Missouri state highway
patrol for any expenses incurred by the patrol in investigating incidents under
subsection 1 of this section.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.